Massachusetts, session 194th, H4021.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first sentence of the fifth paragraph of section 3 of chapter 40A of the
General Laws, as appearing in section 8 of chapter 150 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
striking out the word “No” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- In a municipality
in which low or moderate income housing, as defined in section 20 of chapter 40B, does not
exceed 10 per cent of the housing units reported in the last federal decennial census of the city or
town, no.
SECTION 2. Said fifth paragraph of said section 3 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the
following 2 sentences:- A municipality may decide whether the use of land or structures for an
accessory dwelling unit under this paragraph shall require owner occupancy of either the
accessory dwelling unit or the principal dwelling. A municipality may decide how many
additional parking spaces, if any, shall be required for an accessory dwelling unit.
of 1